Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3608
Nebraska Development Network Program; programs and strategies.

The Nebraska Development Network Program shall create and support community and regional development capacity enhancement programs and strategies throughout Nebraska that:

(1) Recognize shared local, regional, and state responsibility for shaping the community's and the region's economic future and generate and focus public and private resources on effective actions that help communities and businesses to grow and prosper;

(2) Encourage public-private partnerships in order to leverage and enhance public resources through private investment;

(3) Increase the resources directed toward economic development by building support within communities and assisting communities in planning their own economic futures by providing them with comprehensive information about the principles of community and economic development, including the concepts of entrepreneurial communities, strategic planning, leadership training, community development, and effective sustainable economic development; and

(4) Support the work of the Nebraska Development Network regional groups.

Laws 1998, LB 1053, § 8;

Laws 2003, LB 48, § 3.